Maryland, session 2025, HB0430.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
15–138.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “EID Program” means the Employed Individuals with Disabilities
Program operated under the Maryland Medical Assistance Program.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0430*

HOUSE BILL 430
(b) The Department shall provide health care services for individuals under the
EID Program in accordance with this section.
(e) The Department may not:
(1) Limit eligibility to receive EID Program services based on:
(i) The earned or unearned income of the applicant or the
applicant’s spouse;
(ii) Any assets or resources of the applicant’s or recipient’s spouse
that are not joint assets for a recipient;
(iii) Any retirement account assets or resources for an applicant or a
recipient; or
(iv) Any assets or resources in an independence account established
for a recipient of EID Program services; [or]
(2) Establish as a prerequisite for eligibility to receive EID Program
services that an applicant apply for Social Security Disability Insurance benefits when the
applicant does not receive the benefits and has earnings that are above the substantial
gainful activity level established by the Social Security Administration; OR
(3) ESTABLISH AN UPPER AGE LIMIT ON ELIGIBILITY TO RECEIVE
EID PROGRAM SERVICES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.